Utah statutes.
53A-1a-1001.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Contractor" means the educational technology provider selected by the
State Board of Education under Section 53A-1a-1002.
(2)  "Low income" means an income below 200% of the federal poverty guideline.
(3)  "Preschool children" means children who are:
(a)  age four or five; and
(b)  have not entered kindergarten.
(4)  "UPSTART" means the pilot project established by Section 53A-1a-1002 that
uses a home-based educational technology program to develop school readiness
skills of preschool children.
